District of Columbia statutes.
10-509.01a

Escape from juvenile facilities.

No child who has been committed to a juvenile facility shall escape or attempt to escape from a District of Columbia institution described in § 10-509.01. No person shall aid or abet any person to violate this section.

July 3, 1956, ch. 508, § 1a
as added May 15, 1993, D.C. Law 9-272, § 106, 40 DCR 796
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255, § 13, 41 DCR 5193
1981 Ed., § 9-130.1.